Nevada, session 83, AB276.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 363C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Consumer price inflation index” means the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region
(All Items), as published by the United States Department of Labor
or, if that index ceases to be published by the United States
Department of Labor, the published index selected by the
Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 11 of
NRS 361.091.
Sec. 3. “Revenue threshold” means the amount described in
subsection 1 of section 4 of this act for a given taxable year.
Sec. 4. 1. The revenue threshold is:
(a) For the taxable year beginning on July 1, 2025, $4,000,000
plus the product of $4,000,000 multiplied by the average 12-month
percentage increase in the consumer price inflation index for the 3
calendar years immediately preceding the taxable year beginning
on July 1, 2025. The revenue threshold calculated pursuant to this
paragraph must be rounded to the nearest $100,000.
(b) For each subsequent taxable year:
-
*AB276_R1*

– 3 –
(1) If the average 12-month percentage change in the
consumer price inflation index for the 3 calendar years
immediately preceding the taxable year for which the revenue
threshold is being calculated is positive, the revenue threshold for
the immediate preceding taxable year plus the product of the
revenue threshold for the immediately preceding taxable year
multiplied by the average percentage increase in the consumer
price inflation index for the 3 calendar years immediately
preceding the taxable year for which the revenue threshold is
being calculated. A revenue threshold calculated pursuant to this
subparagraph must be rounded to the nearest $100,000.
(2) If the average 12-month percentage change in the
consumer price inflation index for the 3 calendar years
immediately preceding the taxable year for which the revenue
threshold is being calculated is negative, an amount equal to the
revenue threshold for the immediately preceding taxable year. A
revenue threshold calculated pursuant to this subparagraph must
be rounded to the nearest $100,000.
2. Not later than 30 days after July 1, 2025, the Department
shall calculate and publish on its Internet website the revenue
threshold for the taxable year that began on July 1, 2025. Not later
than March 1 of each subsequent year, the Department shall
calculate and publish on its Internet website the revenue threshold
for the taxable year beginning the following July 1.
Sec. 5. NRS 363C.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 363C.015 to
363C.085, inclusive, and sections 2 and 3 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 6. NRS 363C.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.200 1. For the privilege of engaging in a business in
this State, a commerce tax is hereby imposed upon each business
entity whose Nevada gross revenue in a taxable year exceeds
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold in an amount determined
pursuant to NRS 363C.300 to 363C.560, inclusive. The commerce
tax is due and payable as provided in this section.
2. Each business entity whose Nevada gross revenue in a
taxable year exceeds [$4,000,000] the revenue threshold shall, on
or before the 45th day immediately following the end of that taxable
year, file with the Department a return on a form prescribed by the
Department. The Department shall not require a business entity
whose Nevada gross revenue for a taxable year is [$4,000,000]
equal to or less than the revenue threshold to file a return for that
taxable year. The return required by this subsection must include
such information as is required by the Department.
-
*AB276_R1*

– 4 –
3. For the purposes of determining the amount of the
commerce tax due pursuant to this chapter, the initial return filed by
a business entity with the Department pursuant to subsection 2 must
designate the business category in which the business entity is
primarily engaged. A business entity may not change the business
category designated for that business entity unless the person applies
to the Department to change such designation and the Department
determines that the business is no longer primarily engaged in the
designated business category.
4. A business entity shall remit with the return the amount of
commerce tax due pursuant to subsection 1. Upon written
application made before the date on which payment of the
commerce tax due pursuant to this chapter must be made, the
Department may for good cause extend by not more than 30 days
the time within which a business entity is required to pay the
commerce tax. If the commerce tax is paid during the period of
extension, no penalty or late charge may be imposed for failure to
pay the commerce tax at the time required, but the business entity
shall pay interest at the rate of 0.75 percent per month from the date
on which the amount would have been due without the extension
until the date of payment, unless otherwise provided in NRS
360.232 or 360.320.
Sec. 7. NRS 363C.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.300 Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
commerce tax required to be paid by a business entity engaging in a
business in this State is equal to the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by the rate set forth in NRS 363C.310 to 363C.550,
inclusive, for the business category in which the business entity is
primarily engaged. If the business entity cannot be categorized in a
business category set forth in NRS 363C.310 to 363C.550,
inclusive, the commerce tax required to be paid by that business
entity is equal to the amount obtained by subtracting [$4,000,000]
the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue of the
business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that amount by
the rate set forth in NRS 363C.560.
Sec. 8. NRS 363C.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.310 1. The agriculture, forestry, fishing and hunting
business category (NAICS 11) includes all business entities
primarily engaged in agricultural production or agricultural support
activities, or both, including, without limitation, growing crops,
raising animals, harvesting timber and harvesting fish and other
animals from a farm, ranch or their natural habitats.
-
*AB276_R1*

– 5 –
2. Examples of business entities in this category include,
without limitation, farms, ranches, dairies, greenhouses, nurseries,
orchards and hatcheries.
3. This category does not include business entities primarily
engaged in agricultural research or administering programs for
regulating and conserving land, minerals, wildlife or forest use.
4. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.063 percent.
Sec. 9. NRS 363C.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.320 1. The mining, quarrying and oil and gas
extraction business category (NAICS 21) includes all business
entities primarily engaged in mining operations and mining support
activities, including, without limitation, extracting:
(a) Naturally occurring mineral solids, such as coal and ores;
(b) Liquid minerals, such as crude petroleum; and
(c) Gases, such as natural gas.
2. Examples of business entities in this category include,
without limitation:
(a) Business entities operating mines, quarries or oil and gas
wells on their own account or for others on a contract or fee basis.
(b) Mining support activities, including business entities that
perform exploration or other mining services, or both, on a contract
or fee basis, except geophysical surveying, mine site preparation and
the construction of oil and gas pipelines.
3. As used in subsections 1 and 2, the term “mining” includes
quarrying, well operations and beneficiating, including, without
limitation, crushing, screening, washing, flotation and other
preparation customarily performed at a mine site or as a part of
mining activity.
4. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.051 percent.
Sec. 10. NRS 363C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.330 1. The utilities and telecommunications business
category (NAICS 22 and 517, respectively) includes:
(a) All business entities primarily engaged in providing utility
services, including, without limitation, electric power, natural gas,
steam supply, water supply and sewage removal; and
(b) All business entities primarily engaged in providing
telecommunications and the services related to that activity,
-
*AB276_R1*

– 6 –
including, without limitation, telephony, cable and satellite
distribution services, Internet access and telecommunications
reselling services.
2. This category does not include business entities primarily
engaged in waste management and remediation services that are
described in NRS 363C.490.
3. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.136 percent.
Sec. 11. NRS 363C.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.340 1. The construction business category (NAICS 23)
includes all business entities primarily engaged in the construction
of buildings or engineering projects, such as highways and utility
systems. Business entities engaged in the preparation of sites for
new construction and business entities primarily engaged in
subdividing land for sale as building sites also are included in this
category.
2. Examples of business entities in this category include,
without limitation, general contractors, design-builders, construction
managers, turnkey contractors, joint-venture contractors, specialty
trade contractors, for-sale builders, speculative builders and
merchant builders.
3. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.083 percent.
Sec. 12. NRS 363C.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.350 1. The manufacturing business category (NAICS
31, 32 and 33) includes all business entities primarily engaged in the
mechanical, physical or chemical transformation of materials,
substances or components into new products.
2. Examples of business entities in this category include,
without limitation, milk bottling and pasteurizing, water bottling and
processing, fresh fish packaging, apparel jobbing, contracting on
materials owned by others, printing and related activities, ready-
mixed concrete production, leather converting, grinding of lenses to
prescription, wood preserving, electroplating, plating, metal heat,
treating and polishing for the trade, lapidary work for the trade,
fabricating signs and advertising displays, rebuilding or
remanufacturing machinery, ship repair and renovation, machine
shops and tire retreading.
-
*AB276_R1*

– 7 –
3. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.091 percent.
Sec. 13. NRS 363C.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.360 1. The wholesale trade business category (NAICS
42) includes all business entities primarily engaged in wholesaling
merchandise, generally without transformation, and rendering
services incidental to the sale of merchandise.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.101 percent.
Sec. 14. NRS 363C.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.370 1. The retail trade business category (NAICS 44
and 45) includes all businesses primarily engaged in retailing
merchandise, generally without transformation, and rendering
services incidental to the sale of merchandise.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.111 percent.
Sec. 15. NRS 363C.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.380 1. The air transportation business category
(NAICS 481) includes all business entities primarily engaged in
providing air transportation of passengers or cargo, or both, using
aircraft, such as an airplane and helicopter.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.058 percent.
Sec. 16. NRS 363C.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.390 1. The rail transportation business category
(NAICS 482) includes all business entities primarily engaged in
providing rail transportation of passengers or cargo, or both, using
railroad rolling stock.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.331 percent.
-
*AB276_R1*

– 8 –
Sec. 17. NRS 363C.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.400 1. The other transportation business category
(NAICS 483, 485, 486, 487, 488, 491 and 492) includes all business
entities primarily engaged in:
(a) Water transportation, including, without limitation, the
transportation of passengers and cargo using watercraft;
(b) Transit and ground passenger transportation, including,
without limitation, charter buses, school buses, interurban bus
transportation, taxis and limousine services, street railroads,
commuter rail and rapid transit;
(c) Pipeline transportation, including, without limitation, using
transmission pipelines to transport products, such as crude oil,
natural gas, refined petroleum products and slurry;
(d) Scenic and sightseeing transportation, including, without
limitation, on land or the water, or in the air;
(e) Support activities for transportation, including, without
limitation, air traffic control services, marine cargo handling, motor
vehicle towing, railroad switching and terminals, and ship repair and
maintenance not done in a shipyard, such as floating drydock
services in a harbor;
(f) Postal services, including, without limitation, the activities of
the United States Postal Service and its subcontractors operating
under a universal service obligation to provide mail services, deliver
letters and small parcels, and rural post offices on contract to the
United States Postal Service; and
(g) Courier and messenger services, including, without
limitation, the provision of intercity, local or international delivery
of parcels and documents without operating under a universal
service obligation.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.129 percent.
Sec. 18. NRS 363C.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.410 1. The truck transportation business category
(NAICS 484) includes all business entities primarily engaged in
providing over-the-road transportation of cargo using motor
vehicles, such as a truck and tractor trailer.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.202 percent.
-
*AB276_R1*

– 9 –
Sec. 19. NRS 363C.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.420 1. The warehousing and storage business category
(NAICS 493) includes all business entities primarily engaged in
operating warehousing and storage facilities for general
merchandise, refrigerated goods and other warehouse products.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.128 percent.
Sec. 20. NRS 363C.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.430 1. The publishing, software and data processing
business category (NAICS 511, 512, 515 and 518) includes all
business entities primarily engaged in:
(a) Publishing, except on the Internet, including, without
limitation, the publishing of newspapers, magazines, other
periodicals and books, as well as directory and mailing list and
software publishing;
(b) Motion picture and sound recording, including, without
limitation, the production and distribution of motion pictures and
sound recordings;
(c) Broadcasting, except on the Internet, including, without
limitation, creating content or acquiring the right to distribute
content and subsequently broadcast the content; and
(d) Data processing, hosting and related services, including,
without limitation, the provision of infrastructure for hosting and
data processing services.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.253 percent.
Sec. 21. NRS 363C.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.440 1. The finance and insurance business category
(NAICS 52) includes all business entities primarily engaged in
financial transactions or in facilitating financial transactions.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.111 percent.
Sec. 22. NRS 363C.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.450 1. The real estate and rental and leasing business
category (NAICS 53) includes all business entities primarily
engaged in renting, leasing or otherwise allowing the use of tangible
-
*AB276_R1*

– 10 –
or intangible assets, providing related services, managing real estate
for others, selling, renting or buying real estate for others, and
appraising real estate.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.25 percent.
Sec. 23. NRS 363C.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.460 1. The professional, scientific and technical
services business category (NAICS 54) includes all business entities
primarily engaged in performing professional, scientific and
technical activities for others.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.181 percent.
Sec. 24. NRS 363C.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.470 1. The management of companies and enterprises
business category (NAICS 55) includes all business entities
primarily engaged in:
(a) Holding the securities of, or other equity interests in,
companies and enterprises for the purpose of owning a controlling
interest or influencing management decisions; or
(b) Administering, overseeing and managing establishments of
the company or enterprise and that normally undertake the strategic
or organizational planning and decision-making role of the company
or enterprise.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.137 percent.
Sec. 25. NRS 363C.480 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.480 1. The administrative and support services
business category (NAICS 561) includes all business entities
primarily engaged in activities that support the day-to-day
operations of other organizations.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.154 percent.
-
*AB276_R1*

– 11 –
Sec. 26. NRS 363C.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.490 1. The waste management and remediation
services business category (NAICS 562) includes all business
entities primarily engaged in the collection, treatment and disposal
of waste materials.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.261 percent.
Sec. 27. NRS 363C.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.500 1. The educational services business category
(NAICS 61) includes all businesses primarily engaged in providing
instruction and training in a wide variety of subjects.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.281 percent.
Sec. 28. NRS 363C.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.510 1. The health care and social assistance business
category (NAICS 62) includes all business entities primarily
engaged in providing health care and social assistance for natural
persons.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.190 percent.
Sec. 29. NRS 363C.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.520 1. The arts, entertainment and recreation business
category (NAICS 71) includes all business entities primarily
engaged in operating facilities or providing services to meet varied
cultural, entertainment and recreational interests of their patrons.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.24 percent.
Sec. 30. NRS 363C.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.530 1. The accommodation business category (NAICS
721) includes all business entities primarily engaged in providing
lodging or short-term accommodations for travelers, vacationers and
others.
-
*AB276_R1*

– 12 –
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.2 percent.
Sec. 31. NRS 363C.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.540 1. The food services and drinking places business
category (NAICS 722) includes all business entities primarily
engaged in preparing meals, snacks and beverages to customer order
for immediate on-premises and off-premises consumption.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.194 percent.
Sec. 32. NRS 363C.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.550 1. The other services business category (NAICS
81) includes all business entities primarily engaged in providing
services not included in any of the business categories described in
NRS 363C.310 to 363C.540, inclusive. Business entities in this
category are primarily engaged in activities such as repairing
equipment and machinery, promoting or administering religious
activities, grantmaking, advocacy, and providing dry cleaning and
laundry services, personal care services, death care services, pet care
services, photofinishing services, temporary parking services and
dating services.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.142 percent.
Sec. 33. NRS 363C.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363C.560 1. The unclassified business category includes any
business entity not included in any of the business categories
established by NRS 363C.310 to 363C.550, inclusive.
2. The amount of the commerce tax for a business entity
included in this category is the amount obtained by subtracting
[$4,000,000] the revenue threshold from the Nevada gross revenue
of the business entity for the taxable year and multiplying that
amount by 0.128 percent.
Sec. 33.5. NRS 363C.620 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
363C.620 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 360.320 or any other specific statute, interest must be paid
upon any overpayment of any amount of the commerce tax at the
-
*AB276_R1*

– 13 –
rate set forth in, and in accordance with the provisions of,
NRS 360.2937.
2. If the Department determines that any overpayment has been
made intentionally , [or] by reason of carelessness [,] or by
application of a revenue threshold other than the revenue
threshold calculated and published by the Department pursuant to
section 4 of this act, the Department shall not allow any interest on
the overpayment.
Sec. 34. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB276_R1*